New York, session 2025-2026, S1064.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 12 of section 33-1301 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as amended by chapter 19 of the laws of 2021, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 12. For any state department, agency, public benefit corporation or 5 any pesticide applicator employed thereby as a contractor or subcontrac- 6 tor to purchase any product containing glyphosate or apply glyphosate on 7 [state] property[, provided that the application of glyphosate on state 8 property is permitted only for (a) direct application in circumstances 9 when there is no actual or significant threat of direct human exposure 10 and no effective and practicable alternative, and (b) for the following 11 uses, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the department: 12 (i) to maintain critical infrastructure; 13 (ii) to manage roadside vegetation to ensure public safety; 14 (iii) habitat management for the control of invasive species identi- 15 fied pursuant to title seventeen of article nine of this chapter, pests 16 of significant public health importance, noxious weeds designated by the 17 department as injurious to ecosystem health, and the protection of crit- 18 ical native plant species; and 19 (iv) for research purposes to develop sustainable alternatives for 20 agricultural and environmental usages, as well as research regarding the 21 environmental motility of glyphosate. 22 The department shall post information on its website regarding glypho- 23 sate usage pursuant to this section, including amount and location, by 24 April first of each year] owned, operated or leased by the state. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00474-01-5